BrailleTables/en-us-g2.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2008 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# U.S. English Grade 2 Braille Contraction Table
# Created by John Boyer <director@chpi.org>.

class vowel aeiouyAEIOUY
class consonent bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxzBCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXZ

numsign 3456  number sign, just one operand
letsign 56
capsign 6
begcaps 6-6
endcaps 6-3
# If you don't want capitalization comment out the preceding two lines.

# the decimal digits
always 1 1
always 2 12
always 3 14
always 4 145
always 5 15
always 6 124
always 7 1245
always 8 125
always 9 24
always 0 245

# the letter a
lastlargesign a 1
always a 1
always A 1
always about 1-12
contraction ab
always above 1-12-1236
contraction abv
always according 1-14
contraction ac
always across 1-14-1235
contraction acr
always ae =
endword aed 1-1246
word aforesaid 1-123456-15-234-145
always after 1-124
contraction af
sufword afternoon 1-124-1345 afternoons
contraction afn
always afterward 1-124-2456
contraction afw
word again 1-1245
contraction ag
word against 1-1245-34
contraction agst
endword agery = orangery
midendword ally 6-13456
word almost 1-123-134
contraction alm
word already 1-123-1235
contraction alr
word also 1-123
contraction al
word although 1-123-1456
word alth =
word altogether 1-123-2345
contraction alt
word always 1-123-2456
contraction alw
midendword ance 46-15
largesign and 12346
midword angh = Shanghai
begword antenn 1-1345-2345-26-1345 antenna
begword anterio 1-1345-2345-12456-24-135 anterior
begword aqued = aqueduct
always ar 345
word aright 1-5-1235
always arubber 1-1235-136-23-12456 indiarubber
word as 1356
contraction as
midendword ation 6-1345
midendword aunder 1-136-1345-145-12456 saunders
begword auto = autofocus

# the letter b
always b 12
always B 12
always balone = abalone baloney
midword bb 23
midendword bble 12-3456
lowword be 23
begword be 23
begword bea 12-2
always bear 12-15-345
begword beatif 23-1-2345-24-124
begword beatit 23-1-2345-24-2345
begword beatr 23-1-2345-1235 Beatrice
always beck 12-15-14-13
always bed 12-1246
begword beda 23-145-1 bedazzle
begword bede 23-145-15 bedevil
word bede 12-1246-15 bede (a name)
begword bedi 23-145-24 bedizzened
begword bedra 23-145-1235-1 bedraggled
word bee 12-15-15
begword bee 12-15-15
always been 12-15-26
always beer 12-15-12456
word beg =
begword begg 12-15-2356
word begs =
begword bei = beijing
always being 23-346
sufword belch 12-15-123-16
begword beld = Beldon
begword belf = belfry, belfast
begword belg = Belgium
begword belk = Belkin
always bell =
begword belm = Belmont
always belsh 12-15-123-146
always belt =
begword belv = belvedere
begword belw = belwether
always ben 12-26
word benefic 23-1345-15-124-24-14
sufword beneficence 23-1345-15-124-24-14-56-15
sufword beneficent 23-1345-15-124-24-14-26-2345
begword benev 23-1345-15-1236 benevolent
begword benig 23-1345-24-1245 benign
begword benigh 23-1345-24-126 benighted
begword benu 23-1345-136 benumbed
begword ber 12-12456
begword bera 23-1235-1 berating
begword bere 23-1235-15 bereft
begword berea 23-1235-2 bereaved
begword berh 23-1235-125 berhymed
begword beribb 23-1235-24-23 beribboned
begword bering 23-1235-346 beringed (assume Bering with no suffix refers to the Sea and use "er")
begword bero 23-1235-135 berobed
always best 12-15-34
sufword bestow 23-34-246
always beth 12-15-1456 Bethany
always bethe 12-15-2346 Bethel (Hans) Bethe
sufword bethink 23-1456-35-13
sufword bethought 23-1456-5-1256
always bets =
always bett =
sufword bev = bevies
begword bever 12-5-15 Beverly beverage
always bio =
midendword bious 12-24-1256-234 dubious
joinword by 356
word by-and-by 12-13456-36-12346-36-12-13456
always because 23-14
word bec =
always before 23-124
word bef =
always behind 23-125
word behring 12-15-125-1235-346
word beh =
word bel =
begword beln = Belnick
always below 23-123
always beneath 23-1345
always beside 23-234
word bes =
sufword bess = Bessie
always between 23-2345
word bet =
always beyond 23-13456
word bey =
midendword ble 3456
midendword bleau 12-123-2-136 tableau
midendword bleed 12-123-15-1246 nosebleed
always bless 12-46-234 joblessness
always blind 12-123
contraction bl
always blinded 12-123-35-145-1246
sufword blinder 12-123-35-145-12456
word blinding 12-123-35-145-346
always braille 12-1235-123
contraction brl
sufword brigham =
word but 12

# the letter c
always c 14
always C 14
begword cart 14-345-2345 carthorse
word carthage 14-345-1456-1-1245-15
midword cch 14-16
always chloro 16-123-135-1235-135
sufword citron = citronella
sufword coed 14-135-1246
begword cofac = cofactor
always cofound 14-135-124-46-145
begword com 36
begword comingl 14-135-134-346-123 comingle
sufword common 36-134-135-1345 commonest
begword con 25
sufword conceive 25-14-1236
word concv =
word concvd =
word concvr =
word concvs =
word concvst =
word concvth =
sufword conceiving 25-14-1236-1245
word concvg =
always cone 14-5-135
sufword colonel =
sufword conelrad =
word cons 14-135-1345-234
sufword conundrum = 
sufword coronel =
always could 14-145
contraction cd
sufword coworker 14-135-5-2456-12456
midword cc 25
word can 14
always cannot 456-14
word ch =
always ch 16
always character 5-16
sufword chatham 16-1-2345-125-1-134
always chemo 16-15-134-135
word child 16
always children 16-1345
word chn =
sufword chisholm 16-24-234-125-135-123-134
sufword clever 14-123-5-15 cleverest

# the letter d
always d 145
always D 145
begword dachs 145-1-16-234 dachshund
begword dared 145-345-15-145 daredevil
always day 5-145
begword deact = deactivation
begword deall = deallocate
begword decarb 145-15-14-345-12
always deceive 145-14-1236
contraction dcv
contraction dcvd
contraction dcvr
contraction dcvs
word dcvst =
word dcvth =
always deceiving 145-14-1236-1245
contraction dcvg
always declare 145-14-123
contraction dcl
contraction dcld
contraction dclr
contraction dcls
word dclst =
word dclth =
always declaring 145-14-123-1245
contraction dclg
begword deref = dereferencing
begword dereg = deregulation
word deshabille =
midword dd 256
midendword dday 145-5-145 midday
begword dedic 145-1246-24-14 dedicated
always dedu = nondeductible
begword deno = denote
always denom =
begword denou 145-15-1345-1256 denounce
begword denu = denunciation
begword dera = derail
begword deri 145-15-1235-24
begword dero = derogatory
begword dinu 145-24-1345-136
begword dis 256
word disc =
word discs =
always dish 145-24-146
begword disha 256-125-1 dishabile
begword dishear 256-125-15-345 disheartened
begword disho 256-125-135 dishonor
begword dishone 256-125-5-135 dishonest
sufword disk =
sufword dispirit 145-24-456-234 dispirited
begword disul = disulfide
word do 145
sufword doolittle =
always dumb = dumbbell

# the letter e
always e 15
always E 15
midword ea 2
midword eabil = interchangeability
always eable 15-1-3456
endword eably = noticeably
midendword eage = mileage
midendword eager 2-1245-12456 meager
always eally 15-6-13456
midendword eance 15-46-15 vengeance
midendword eand 15-12346 meander
always eation 15-6-1345
always ear 15-345
sufword hideaw = hideaway
always ed 1246
always edic = edict Benedict
sufword edition 15-145-24-56-1345 editions
midword edo 15-145-135
always edraw =
word either 15-24
contraction ei
word en =
always en 26
always ename 15-5-1345
sufword enamel 26-1-134-15-123 enameled
midendword ence 56-15
always enceph 26-14-15-1234-125 electroencephalogram
sufword endow 26-145-246
always eneck = bottleneck
midendword eness 15-56-234 closeness
begword enor = enormous
begword enou 15-1345-1256
lowword enough 26
word enough 26-1256-126
begword enu 15-1345-136
begword equino = equinox
always er 12456
begword era =
word eras 12456-1-234
begword erec = erect 
begword ero 15-1235-135
midendword eroom = storeroom
begword eru = erupt
always ethole 15-2345-125-135-123-15 bullethole
always ever 5-15
midendword evere 15-1236-12456-15 Everest
always evered 15-1236-12456-1246
word every 15

# the letter f
always f 124
always F 124
sufword falcon = falconer
midword ff 235
always father 5-124
sufword fed 124-1246 fedora
always fein 124-15-35 Feingold
always first 124-34
word fst =
always fever 124-15-1236-12456
always ffor 124-123456
largesign for 123456
always fore 123456-15
begword forens 123456-26-234 forensic
always forever 123456-5-15 forevermore
always foot =
word from 124
before vowel always friend 124-1235-24-26-145
always friend 124-1235
contraction fr
word fruity =
midendword ful 56-123
always funder 124-136-1345-145-12456

# the letter g
always g 1245
always G 1245
begword geo = geoengineering
sufword geoff 1245-15-12356-124 Geoffrey
midword gg 2356
always gh 126
endword ngham = Langham
always ghead 1245-125-2-145
always gheart 1245-125-15-345-2345
midendword ghill = dunghill
midendword ghorn = bighorn
always ghouse 1245-125-1256-234-15
always ghz = (gigahertz)
begword givea = giveaway
sufword gnome = gnomedb
word go 1245
always good 1245-145
contraction gd
begword gos = goshawk
word goshen 1245-135-146-26
always great 1245-1235-2345
contraction grt
sufword guenever 1245-136-26-15-1236-12456

# the letter h
always h 125
always H 125
always had 456-125
begword hadd 125-1-256 haddock
sufword hade = hadean 
sufword hadr = hadrian 
word have 125
always headd 125-2-145-145 headdress
always here 5-125
always hered 125-12456-1246
always heren 125-12456-26
midendword herence 125-12456-56-15 adherence
always herer 125-12456-12456
begword heres 125-12456-15-234 heresy
always heret 125-12456-15-2345
word heretofore 5-125-2345-135-123456-15
word herself 125-12456-124
word herf =
word him 125-134
word hm 125-3-134
sufword hmm =
word himself 125-134-124
contraction hmf
lowword his 236
sufword horse = horseradish
always hydro =

# the letter i
word i 24
always i 24
always I 24
midendword iever 24-15-1236-12456
always immediate 24-134-134
contraction imm
begword immuno = immunofluorescence
lowword in 35
word in =
always in 35
begword incon 35-14-135-1345 incongruous
begword indis 35-145-24-234 indistinct
always iness 24-56-234
midendword ing 346
midword inga 35-1245-1 nightingale
always ingar 35-1245-345 Weingarten
midword ingi 35-1245-24 meningitis
midendword inging 346-346 bringing
joinword into 35-235
always isomer 24-234-135-134-12456
word it 1346
word its 1346-234
contraction xs
word itself 1346-124
contraction xf
midendword ity 56-13456

# the letter j
always j 245
always J 245
word just 245

# the letter k
always k 13
always K 13
always know 5-13
word knowledge 13

# the letter l
always l 123
always L 123
midendword less 46-234
always letter 123-1235
contraction lr
word like 123
always little 123-123
contraction ll
always lord 5-123
word lucknow 123-136-14-13-1345-246
